Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.805

Review of distributions to cities and counties—Report.

During calendar year 2008, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall review the distributions to cities and counties under RCW 43.08.290 to determine the extent to which the distributions target the needs of cities and counties for which the repeal of the motor vehicle excise tax had the greatest fiscal impact. In conducting the study, the committee shall solicit input from the cities and counties. The department of revenue and the state treasurer shall provide the committee with any data within their purview that the committee considers necessary to conduct the review. The committee shall report to the legislature the results of its findings, and any recommendations for changes to the distribution formulas under RCW 43.08.290, by December 31, 2008.

[ 2005 c 450 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 450: See note following RCW 82.45.060.